District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the "Revised Game of Skill Machines Consumer Protections Amendment Act of
2025".

Sec. 2. Title 25 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 25-113.01(e)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(e)(1) A licensee under a manufacturer's license class A or B or an on-
premises retailer's license, class C/R, D/R, C/H, D/H, C/T, D/T, C/N, D/N, C/X, or DX, shall
obtain a game of skill machine endorsement from the Board in order to offer a game of skill
machine on the licensed premises.”
(2)(A) A game of skill machine shall not be placed on outdoor public or
private space; except, that the Board, in its discretion, may allow for the placement of a game of
skill machine on outdoor public or private space if, in the Board's determination, activity
associated with the game of skill machine is:
(i) Not visible from a public street or sidewalk;
(ii) Adequately secured against unauthorized entrance; and
(iii) Accessible only by patrons from within the establishment.

(B) Subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not apply to a licensee
operating a passenger-carrying marine vessel in accordance with § 25-113(h).”
Sec. 3. The Law to Legalize Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games, and Bingo and Raffles for
Charitable Purposes in the District of Columbia, effective March 10, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-172;
D.C. Official Code §§ 22-1716 to 22-1718 and 36-601.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:

(a) Section 408 (D.C. Official Code § 36-641.08) is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (a) is amended as follows:
“(a)(2) Possesses a retailer’s license, and a game of skill machine endorsement
from ABCA in accordance with § 25-113.01(e); and”
(2) Subparagraph (b) is amended by striking the phrase “Office” inserting the
phrase “ABCA” in its place.
(3) Subparagraph (b)(3) is amended by striking the phrase “Office” inserting the
phrase “ABCA” in its place.
(4) Subparagraph (b)(4) is amended by striking the phrase “Office” inserting the
phrase “ABCA” in its place.
(5) Subparagraph (e) is amended by striking the phrase “Office” inserting the
phrase “ABCA” in its place.
(b) Section 408 (D.C. Official Code § 36-641.13(a)(1)) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) The Office shall procure a centralized accounting system for games of
skill machines, which shall be linked to a communications network. All games of skill machines
registered in the District shall connect to the centralized accounting system through the
communications network. The centralized accounting system shall be administered by the Office
and shall allow for the accounting, reporting, monitoring, and reading of game of skill machine
activities by the District for the purposes of assisting the Office in determining compliance with,

and enforcing, the provisions of this subchapter and the rules issued pursuant to this subchapter.
The centralized accounting system shall also allow for game of skill machines to be activated
and deactivated remotely by the Office.”
(c) Section 421 (D.C. Official Code § 36-641.21(a)) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) The CFO, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall amend
existing rules regarding skill games in the District of Columbia and issue rules to implement the
provisions of this subchapter consistent with the new authority to ABCA.”
Sec. 4. Severability.
If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is
found by a court invalid, such determination shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973, (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.